South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4561.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 6 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 6-1-200. (A) If any other provision of law requires a referendum on a proposal by any political subdivision, including school districts, to issue bonds, incur general obligation debt, impose or modify a tax millage rate, or impose any other tax or fee, the referendum must be held at the time of a statewide general election on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November of an even-numbered year. (B) In the event there is a conflict between this section and any other section or local law, the provisions of this section control. SECTION 2.  Section 4-10-10(6) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (6) "General election" means the Tuesday following the first Monday in November in any even-numbered year. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect on January 1, 2027. ----XX----